Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE J. WATER IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9301. CAMERON COUNTY WATER IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NUMBER TEN

Sec. 9301.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Cameron County Water Improvement District Number Ten.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 9301.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 9301.003. PURPOSE. The purposes of the district are:

(1) to reclaim and irrigate the district's arid, semiarid, and other lands needing irrigation;

(2) to reclaim and drain the district's overflowed lands and other lands needing drainage; and

(3) all other purposes under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 9301.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district is composed of the territory described by Section 1, Chapter 110, Acts of the 41st Legislature, 1st Called Session, 1929, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Chapter 2, Title 128, Revised Statutes, before August 30, 1971;

(2) Chapter 55, Water Code, before September 1, 1995;

(3) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(4) other law.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 9301.005. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature determines that:

(1) all property within the boundaries of the district is benefited by the creation of the district;

(2) no property not benefited by the creation of the district is included in the district's boundaries; and

(3) the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 9301.006. GOVERNING LAW; POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The district is governed by Chapters 49 and 55, Water Code.

(b) The district has the rights, powers, privileges, duties, and functions of a water improvement district under the Texas Constitution and general law, including Chapters 49 and 55, Water Code.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 9301.007. BOARD OF DIRECTORS. (a) The board consists of five directors.

(b) A director must meet the qualifications for a director under Chapter 55, Water Code.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.